test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3waabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: owaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iwaaboozensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iwaaboozensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iwaaboozensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iwaaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iwaaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iwaaboozensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iwaaboozensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iwaaboozensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iwaaboozensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iwaaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iwaaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iwaaboozensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iwaaboozensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iwaaboozensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iwaaboozensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iwaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iwaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iwaaboozensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iwaaboozenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iwaaboozenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iwaaboozenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iwaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iwaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iwaaboozenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iwaaboozenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iwaaboozenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iwaaboozenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iwaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iwaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iwaaboozenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iwaaboozenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iwaaboozenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iwaaboozenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iwaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iwaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefwaabooz+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iwaaboozenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
